src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX c2 Y 491
SFX c2 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX c2 er ant/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçant/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 éger égeant/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 er é/q' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbre/n'q'j'l't' ébrer
SFX c2 écer èce/n'q'j'l't' écer
SFX c2 écher èche/n'q'j'l't' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècre/n'q'j'l't' écrer
SFX c2 éder ède/n'q'j'l't' éder
SFX c2 éger ège/n'q'j'l't' éger
SFX c2 égler ègle/n'q'j'l't' égler
SFX c2 égner ègne/n'q'j'l't' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègre/n'q'j'l't' égrer
SFX c2 éguer ègue/n'q'j'l't' éguer
SFX c2 éler èle/n'q'j'l't' éler
SFX c2 émer ème/n'q'j'l't' émer
SFX c2 éner ène/n'q'j'l't' éner
SFX c2 éper èpe/n'q'j'l't' éper
SFX c2 équer èque/n'q'j'l't' équer
SFX c2 érer ère/n'q'j'l't' érer
SFX c2 éser èse/n'q'j'l't' éser
SFX c2 éter ète/n'q'j'l't' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètre/n'q'j'l't' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvre/n'q'j'l't' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èye/n'q'j'l't' éyer
SFX c2 ébrer èbres/n'q'l'm' ébrer
SFX c2 écer èces/n'q'l'm' écer
SFX c2 écher èches/n'q'l'm' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècres/n'q'l'm' écrer
SFX c2 éder èdes/n'q'l'm' éder
SFX c2 éger èges/n'q'l'm' éger
SFX c2 égler ègles/n'q'l'm' égler
SFX c2 égner ègnes/n'q'l'm' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègres/n'q'l'm' égrer
SFX c2 éguer ègues/n'q'l'm' éguer
SFX c2 éler èles/n'q'l'm' éler
SFX c2 émer èmes/n'q'l'm' émer
SFX c2 éner ènes/n'q'l'm' éner
SFX c2 éper èpes/n'q'l'm' éper
SFX c2 équer èques/n'q'l'm' équer
SFX c2 érer ères/n'q'l'm' érer
SFX c2 éser èses/n'q'l'm' éser
SFX c2 éter ètes/n'q'l'm' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètres/n'q'l'm' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvres/n'q'l'm' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èyes/n'q'l'm' éyer
SFX c2 ébrer èbre/n'q'l'm't's' ébrer
SFX c2 écer èce/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 écher èche/n'q'l'm't's' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècre/n'q'l'm't's' écrer
SFX c2 éder ède/n'q'l'm't's' éder
SFX c2 éger ège/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 égler ègle/n'q'l'm't's' égler
SFX c2 égner ègne/n'q'l'm't's' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègre/n'q'l'm't's' égrer
SFX c2 éguer ègue/n'q'l'm't's' éguer
SFX c2 éler èle/n'q'l'm't's' éler
SFX c2 émer ème/n'q'l'm't's' émer
SFX c2 éner ène/n'q'l'm't's' éner
SFX c2 éper èpe/n'q'l'm't's' éper
SFX c2 équer èque/n'q'l'm't's' équer
SFX c2 érer ère/n'q'l'm't's' érer
SFX c2 éser èse/n'q'l'm't's' éser
SFX c2 éter ète/n'q'l'm't's' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètre/n'q'l'm't's' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvre/n'q'l'm't's' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èye/n'q'l'm't' éyer
SFX c2 er ons/n'q'l't' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçons/n'q'l't' écer
SFX c2 éger égeons/n'q'l't' éger
SFX c2 er ez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbrent/n'q'l'm't's' ébrer
SFX c2 écer ècent/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 écher èchent/n'q'l'm't's' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècrent/n'q'l'm't's' écrer
SFX c2 éder èdent/n'q'l'm't's' éder
SFX c2 éger ègent/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 égler èglent/n'q'l'm't's' égler
SFX c2 égner ègnent/n'q'l'm't's' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègrent/n'q'l'm't's' égrer
SFX c2 éguer èguent/n'q'l'm't's' éguer
SFX c2 éler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' éler
SFX c2 émer èment/n'q'l'm't's' émer
SFX c2 éner ènent/n'q'l'm't's' éner
SFX c2 éper èpent/n'q'l'm't's' éper
SFX c2 équer èquent/n'q'l'm't's' équer
SFX c2 érer èrent/n'q'l'm't's' érer
SFX c2 éser èsent/n'q'l'm't's' éser
SFX c2 éter ètent/n'q'l'm't's' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètrent/n'q'l'm't's' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvrent/n'q'l'm't's' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èyent/n'q'l'm't's' éyer
SFX c2 er ais/n'q'j'l't' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçais/n'q'j'l't' écer
SFX c2 éger égeais/n'q'j'l't' éger
SFX c2 er ais/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçais/n'q'l'm' écer
SFX c2 éger égeais/n'q'l'm' éger
SFX c2 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçait/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 éger égeait/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 er ions/n'q'l't' er
SFX c2 er iez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX c2 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçaient/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 éger égeaient/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 er ai/n'q'j'l't' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçai/n'q'j'l't' écer
SFX c2 éger égeai/n'q'j'l't' éger
SFX c2 er as/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éças/n'q'l'm' écer
SFX c2 éger égeas/n'q'l'm' éger
SFX c2 er a/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éça/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 éger égea/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 er âmes/n'q'l't' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçâmes/n'q'l't' écer
SFX c2 éger égeâmes/n'q'l't' éger
SFX c2 er âtes/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er
SFX c2 écer éçâtes/n'q'l'm' écer
SFX c2 éger égeâtes/n'q'l'm' éger
SFX c2 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX c2 er erai/n'q'j'l't' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbrerai/n'q'j'l't' ébrer
SFX c2 écer ècerai/n'q'j'l't' écer
SFX c2 écher ècherai/n'q'j'l't' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècrerai/n'q'j'l't' écrer
SFX c2 éder èderai/n'q'j'l't' éder
SFX c2 éger ègerai/n'q'j'l't' éger
SFX c2 égler èglerai/n'q'j'l't' égler
SFX c2 égner ègnerai/n'q'j'l't' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègrerai/n'q'j'l't' égrer
SFX c2 éguer èguerai/n'q'j'l't' éguer
SFX c2 éler èlerai/n'q'j'l't' éler
SFX c2 émer èmerai/n'q'j'l't' émer
SFX c2 éner ènerai/n'q'j'l't' éner
SFX c2 éper èperai/n'q'j'l't' éper
SFX c2 équer èquerai/n'q'j'l't' équer
SFX c2 érer èrerai/n'q'j'l't' érer
SFX c2 éser èserai/n'q'j'l't' éser
SFX c2 éter èterai/n'q'j'l't' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètrerai/n'q'j'l't' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvrerai/n'q'j'l't' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èyerai/n'q'j'l't' éyer
SFX c2 er eras/n'q'l'm' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbreras/n'q'l'm' ébrer
SFX c2 écer èceras/n'q'l'm' écer
SFX c2 écher ècheras/n'q'l'm' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècreras/n'q'l'm' écrer
SFX c2 éder èderas/n'q'l'm' éder
SFX c2 éger ègeras/n'q'l'm' éger
SFX c2 égler ègleras/n'q'l'm' égler
SFX c2 égner ègneras/n'q'l'm' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègreras/n'q'l'm' égrer
SFX c2 éguer ègueras/n'q'l'm' éguer
SFX c2 éler èleras/n'q'l'm' éler
SFX c2 émer èmeras/n'q'l'm' émer
SFX c2 éner èneras/n'q'l'm' éner
SFX c2 éper èperas/n'q'l'm' éper
SFX c2 équer èqueras/n'q'l'm' équer
SFX c2 érer èreras/n'q'l'm' érer
SFX c2 éser èseras/n'q'l'm' éser
SFX c2 éter èteras/n'q'l'm' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètreras/n'q'l'm' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvreras/n'q'l'm' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èyeras/n'q'l'm' éyer
SFX c2 er era/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbrera/n'q'l'm't's' ébrer
SFX c2 écer ècera/n'q'l'm't's' écer
SFX c2 écher èchera/n'q'l'm't's' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècrera/n'q'l'm't's' écrer
SFX c2 éder èdera/n'q'l'm't's' éder
SFX c2 éger ègera/n'q'l'm't's' éger
SFX c2 égler èglera/n'q'l'm't's' égler
SFX c2 égner ègnera/n'q'l'm't's' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègrera/n'q'l'm't's' égrer
SFX c2 éguer èguera/n'q'l'm't's' éguer
SFX c2 éler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' éler
SFX c2 émer èmera/n'q'l'm't's' émer
SFX c2 éner ènera/n'q'l'm't's' éner
SFX c2 éper èpera/n'q'l'm't's' éper
SFX c2 équer èquera/n'q'l'm't's' équer
SFX c2 érer èrera/n'q'l'm't's' érer
SFX c2 éser èsera/n'q'l'm't's' éser
SFX c2 éter ètera/n'q'l'm't's' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètrera/n'q'l'm't's' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvrera/n'q'l'm't's' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èyera/n'q'l'm't's' éyer
SFX c2 er erons/n'q'l't' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbrerons/n'q'l't' ébrer
SFX c2 écer ècerons/n'q'l't' écer
SFX c2 écher ècherons/n'q'l't' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècrerons/n'q'l't' écrer
SFX c2 éder èderons/n'q'l't' éder
SFX c2 éger ègerons/n'q'l't' éger
SFX c2 égler èglerons/n'q'l't' égler
SFX c2 égner ègnerons/n'q'l't' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègrerons/n'q'l't' égrer
SFX c2 éguer èguerons/n'q'l't' éguer
SFX c2 éler èlerons/n'q'l't' éler
SFX c2 émer èmerons/n'q'l't' émer
SFX c2 éner ènerons/n'q'l't' éner
SFX c2 éper èperons/n'q'l't' éper
SFX c2 équer èquerons/n'q'l't' équer
SFX c2 érer èrerons/n'q'l't' érer
SFX c2 éser èserons/n'q'l't' éser
SFX c2 éter èterons/n'q'l't' éter
SFX c2 étrer ètrerons/n'q'l't' étrer
SFX c2 évrer èvrerons/n'q'l't' évrer
SFX c2 éyer èyerons/n'q'l't' éyer
SFX c2 er erez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX c2 ébrer èbrerez/n'q'l'm' ébrer
SFX c2 écer ècerez/n'q'l'm' écer
SFX c2 écher ècherez/n'q'l'm' écher
SFX c2 écrer ècrerez/n'q'l'm' écrer
SFX c2 éder èderez/n'q'l'm' éder
SFX c2 éger ègerez/n'q'l'm' éger
SFX c2 égler èglerez/n'q'l'm' égler
SFX c2 égner ègnerez/n'q'l'm' égner
SFX c2 égrer ègrerez/n'q'l'm' égrer
SFX c2 éguer èguerez/n'q'l'm' éguer
SFX c2 éler èlerez/n'q'l'm' éler
SFX c2 émer èmerez/n'q'l'm' émer
SFX c2 éner ènerez/n'q'l'm' éner
SFX c2 éper èperez/n'q'l'm' éper
SFX c2 équer èquerez/n'q'l'm' équer
SFX c2 érer èrerez/n'q'l'm' érer
SFX c2 éser èserez/n'q'l'm' éser
SFX c2 éter èterez/n'q'l'm' éter
