src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.dic
aciérer/c2a+()
acérer/c2a+()
adultérer/c2a+()
affréter/c2a+()
allécher/c2a+()
alléguer/c2a+()
aléser/c2a+()
appéter/c2a+()
arpéger/c2a+()
arriérer/c2a+()
assiéger/c2a+()
asséner/c2a+()
emmétrer/c2a+()
empiéger/c2a+()
enflécher/c2a+()
enstérer/c2a+()
espérer/c2a+()
excréter/c2a+()
excéder/c2a+()
exhéréder/c2a+()
exulcérer/c2a+()
exécrer/c2a+()
hydrogéner/c2a+()
impétrer/c2a+()
incarcérer/c2a+()
incinérer/c2a+()
indifférer/c2a+()
inférer/c2a+()
itérer/c2a+()
oblitérer/c2a+()
obséder/c2a+()
écrémer/c2a+()
émécher/c2a+()
énumérer/c2a+()
éviscérer/c2a+()
